apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOLTU
 +Der1+Der/l+V:»l MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»X2ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»lahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»las'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»leas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»X4h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»Q4halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»Q4hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»X4hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»X4has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»X4heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»W7stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»Q8d MUITALStem ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»W4st MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W5stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W5stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W7stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W7stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»W4stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»W4stas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»W4steas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V:»l MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»X2ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»lahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»las'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»leas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»X4h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»Q4halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»Q4hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»X4hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»X4has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»X4heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»W7stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVI
 +Der1+Der/st:»W4st COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla:»W5stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda:»W5stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla:»W7stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda:»W7stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti:»W4stas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti:»W4steas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l:»l COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda:»W6ladda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda:»X2ladda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti:»las'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti:»leas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva:»W7stuvva%> ARVICnj ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d MUITALStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsGILLE
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st ALISTStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d ALISTStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE
 +Der1+Der/st:»st COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla:»stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda:»stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti:»stas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti:»steas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva:»stuvva%> ARVICnj ;



LEXICON DeverbalVerbsMUITAL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsALIST
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsLASSAN
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT
 +Der2+Der/alla:»X1alla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/adda:»X1adda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/asti:»as'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/easti:»eas'ti%> ARVICnj ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVIL
 +Der2+Der/adda:»X1adda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/asti:»as'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/easti:»eas'ti%> ARVICnj ;






! -------
! Clitics
! -------

LEXICON K
 ENDLEX ;
 K-nai ;
 K-default ;
 
LEXICON K-default
 K-ge ;
 ENDLEX ;
 +Qst+Use/Circ:#go ENDLEX ;  	  ! !I removed the Circ symbol from these two, as they are common.
 +Qst+Foc/son+Use/Circ:#goson ENDLEX ; 
 +Foc/ba+Use/Circ:#ba ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/be+Use/Circ:#be ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/bat+Use/Circ:#bat ENDLEX ; 
 +Foc/son+Use/Circ:#son ENDLEX ;  !  ! makkárson
 +Foc/ba+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#ba#hal ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/be+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#be#hal ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/ba+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#ba#han ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/be+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#be#han ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/ba+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#ba#son ENDLEX ;   
 +Foc/be+Use/Circ+Use/NG:#be#son ENDLEX ;   

LEXICON K-ge
 +Foc/ge+Use/Circ:#ge ENDLEX ;	 ! !Alternatively, the K lexicon may be done at PL as a compound lexicon
 +Foc/gen+Use/Circ:#gen ENDLEX ;  ! ! Also, the symbol should be ^L^ (large), rather than ^-C-^
 K-han ;
  ENDLEX ;

 
LEXICON K-han
 +Foc/hal+Use/Circ:#hal ENDLEX ;  !  ! XXX Is this required?
 +Foc/han+Use/Circ:#han ENDLEX ; 

LEXICON K-nai
 +Foc/naj+Qst+Use/Circ:#naigo ENDLEX ; 
 +Foc/naj+Use/Circ:#nai ENDLEX ;	
 +Foc/ges+Use/Circ:#ges ENDLEX ;  ! ! Attested for 'muges'. Others?
 +Foc/gis+Use/Circ:#gis ENDLEX ;  ! ! Means same as ges and is maybe more common
 +Foc/ban+Use/Circ:#ban ENDLEX ; 

LEXICON Noun
eise#váldi+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:eiseváldiid9 K ; ! Wrong, but 18x in corp.
eise#váldi+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:eiseváldiid9 K ;
eise#váldi+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:eiseváldit K ; ! Wrong, but 97x in corp.
mátki+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:mátkiid K ; ! Wrong.
vánhen+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:vánhemmat K ; ! Wrong, probably dialectal form.
fága+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:fágai K ;
guovlu+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:guovlluis K ; !SOUTH
guovttis+v2+N+Coll+Sg+Nom+CmpN/Last+CmpN/SgGenLeft+Use/NG:guovttes%> K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Ess:nubbin#giella%>n K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Acc:nuppijd9#giela%>jd9 K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Com:nuppiiguin#giela%>iguin K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Com:nuppijd9#giela%>iguin K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Gen:nuppijd9#giela%>jd9 K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Ill:nuppijd9#giela%>ide K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Loc:nuppiin#giela%>in K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Pl+Nom:nuppit#giela%>t K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Acc:nuppe#giela%> K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Com:nuppiin#giela%>in K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Gen:nuppe#giela%> K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Ill:nuppe#gilli%>i K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Loc:nuppe#giela%>s K ;
nubbe#giella+N+Sg+Nom:nubbe#giella%> K ;
olgo#riika+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:olgo#rit%> K ;
rádji+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub+Plc:rádjii K ;
LEXICON Adjective
albma+A+Sg+Nom:albma%> K ;
boaris+A+Comp+Attr+Use/Sub:boarrasat K ; !  should be -á-
boaris+A+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:boarrasat K ;    !  should be -á-
eambbo+A+Comp+Pl+Nom:eambbo%>t K ;
eambbo+A+Comp+Sg+Acc:eambbo%> K ;
eambbo+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:eambbo%> K ;
gummá+A+Comp:gummá%>t K ;
gummá+A+Sg+Nom:gummá%> K ;
gummá+A+Superl:gummá%>mus K ;
ruoná+A+Ess:ruoná%>jin K ;
veara+A+Ess:veara%>n K ;
veara+A+Sg+Gen:veara%> K ;
veara+A+Sg+Nom:veara%> K ;
váivi+A+Sg+Gen+veara+A+Attr:váivvi»#veara%> K ;
váivi+A+Sg+Gen+veara+A+Sg+Ess:váivvi»#veara%>n K ;
váivi+A+Sg+Gen+veara+A+Sg+Nom:váivvi»#veara%> K ;
áige#guovdil+A+Comp+Ess+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččabun K ;
áige#guovdil+A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:áige#guovdilaččat K ;
LEXICON ProperNoun
Fuosku+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@Fuoskui K ; ! !Alternative illative
Olgoáššiidministeriija+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill:@U.Cap.Obl@Olgo^áššiid^ministeriijai K ;
Suoma% olgoáššiidministeriija+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill:@U.Cap.Obl@Suoma% olgo^áššiid^ministeriijai K ;
Jakt-% och% fiskesamerna+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom+CmpN/None:@U.Cap.Obl@Jakt-% och% fiske^samerna K ; !
Samerna+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Obl@Samerna K ;
Skogssamerna+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Obl@Skogs^samerna K ;
Tampere+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill:@U.Cap.Obl@Tamperei K ; !alt. ill-form
Yle+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill:@U.Cap.Obl@Ylei K ; !alt. ill-form
LEXICON 11TO99F
okta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:okta%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
okta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:okta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
okta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr:okta%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
akta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:akta%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
akta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:akta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
akta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr:akta%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:guokte%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:guokte%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr:guokte%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
nubbe#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:nubbe%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
nubbe#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:nubbe%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
nubbe#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr:nubbe%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
LEXICON CUODI
čuođi+Num+Sg+Nom:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Acc:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Gen:čuođi%> K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Loc:čuođi%>s K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:čuođi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
čuođi+Num+Pl+Nom:čuođi%>t K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Ill:čuohtá%>j K ;
čuođi+Num+Sg+Com:čuđi%>jn K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Acc:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Gen:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Ill:čuđi%>jde K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Loc:čuđi%>jn K ;
čuođi+Num+Pl+Com:čuđi%>jgujn K ;
čuođi+Num+Ess:čuođi%>n K ;
čuohti+Num+Attr:čuohti%> K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Nom:čuohti%> K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Acc:čuođi%> K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Gen:čuođi%> K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Loc:čuođi%>s K ;
 čuohti+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:čuođi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
čuohti+Num+Pl+Nom:čuođi%>t K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Ill:čuohtá%>j K ;
čuohti+Num+Sg+Com:čuđi%>jn K ;
čuohti+Num+Pl+Acc:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuohti+Num+Pl+Gen:čuđi%>X5jd K ;
čuohti+Num+Pl+Ill:čuđi%>jde K ;
čuohti+Num+Pl+Com:čuđi%>jgujn K ;
akta#čuohti+Num+Sg+Nom:akta#čuohti%> K ;
LEXICON num-imprecise
moadde#logi#+Num+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:moatti%>#lot%> K ; ! !Dialect
beal#okta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:beal#okta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
beal#guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:beal#guokte%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
beal#guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:beal#guokte%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
beal% okta#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Ill:beal% okta%>#nuppe#lohká%>j K ; !time
beal% guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Loc:beal% guokte%>#nuppe#logi%>s K ; !time
beal% guokte#nuppe#lohkái+Num+Sg+Attr:beal% guokte%>#nuppe#logi%> K ; !time
